Massachusetts, session 194th, H145.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of Chapter 94G of the General Laws is amended by inserting, at the end of the
section, the following subsection:-
(m) The commission shall not prohibit the delivery of cannabis by licensed delivery
operators or couriers to any municipality in the commonwealth nor to any establishment that
provides overnight lodging services to tourists and visitors, including but not limited to hotels,
motels, and resorts.
of 1